en: Quark with 65% to 85% fat in dry mass
de: Quark Doppelrahmstufe, Quark 65% bis 85% Fett i. Tr.

en: Soured milk quark, Quark from soured milk
de: Sauermilchquark
fr: Quark au lait caillé, Quark caillé
hr: Kiselo mlijeko quark

en: Rennet quark
de: Labquark

en: Buttermilk quark, Quark from buttermilk
de: Buttermilchquark
fr: Quark au babeurre, quark au lait ribot, quark au lait battu
hr: Mlaćenica quark

en: whey powder
bg: суроватка на прах
de: Molkenpulver, Molkepulver
es: suero en polvo
fi: Herajauhe
fr: lactosérum en poudre
hr: Sirutka u prahu
it: Siero in polvere
ja: ホエイパウダー
lt: Išrūgų milteliai

en: whey
fr: lactosérum

en: Whey butter
fr: Beurre de lactosérum

en: Milk permeate
fr: Perméat de Lait

en: Buttermilks
de: Buttermilch, Buttermilche, Buttermilchen
fi: piimät
fr: Babeurres, Laits battus, Laits de beurre, Laits ribots
hr: Mlaćenice
it: Latticelli, Laticello
lt: Pasukos
nl: Karnemelken, Botermelken
pl: Maślanka, Maślanki

en: Light buttermilks
fr: Babeurres allégés

en: Eggnog without alcohol
fr: Lait de poule sans alcool

en: Milks (liquid and powder)
fr: Laits (fluide et poudre)
nl: Melk (vloeibaar en poeder)
zh: 牛乳（液态奶和奶粉类）

en: Milks, Milk as a drink
af: Melk
am: ወተት
an: Leit
ar: حليب
as: গাখীৰ
ay: Millk'i
az: Süd
ba: Һөт
be: малако
bg: Млека, мляко
bm: Nɔnɔ
bn: দুধ
br: Laezh
bs: Mlijeko
ca: llet
cr: ᒎᒎᔑᓈᐴ
cs: mléko
cv: Сĕт
cy: llaeth
da: mælk
de: Milch, Milche, Milchen
el: Γάλα
eo: lakto
es: Leches
et: piim
eu: Esne
fa: شیر
fi: maito
fr: Laits, lait
fy: molke
ga: Bainne
gd: Bainne
gl: leite
gn: Kamby
gu: દૂધ
he: חלב
hi: दूध
hr: mlijeka, mlijeko
ht: Lèt
hu: tej
hy: Կաթ
ia: Lacte
id: Susu
ik: Immuk
io: Lakto
is: Mjólk
it: Latte
iu: ᐃᒻᒧᒃ
ja: 乳
jv: Susu
ka: რძე
kk: Сүт
kn: ಹಾಲು
ko: 젖
lt: Pienas
nl: Melk
pl: Mleko
pt: Leites
ro: lăpturi
ru: Молоко
sv: Mjölk
th: กลุ่มผลิตภัณฑ์นม
tr: Süt
zh: 奶

en: Milks from Austria, Austrian milks
bg: Австрийско мляко
fr: Laits autrichiens
hr: Mlijeko iz austrije
lt: Austriški pienas

en: Haymilk
de: Heumilch
es: Leche de heno
fr: Lait de foin
hr: Mlijeko od sijena
it: Latte fieno

en: Spanish milks, Milks from Spain
bg: Испанско мляко
fr: Laits espagnols
hr: Španjolska mlijeka
lt: Ispaniški pienas

en: Dairy drinks, dairy beverages, milk-based drinks
bg: Млечни напитки
ca: Begudes làcties, begudes amb base de llet
da: Mælkedrik, Mælkebaserede drikkevarer
de: Milchgetränke
es: Bebida lácteas
fi: Maitojuomat
fr: Boissons lactées
he: משקאות חלביים
hr: Mliječni napici
hu: Tejitalok
it: Bevande a base di latte
ja: 乳飲料
lt: Pieno gėrimai
nl: Zuiveldranken, Zuiveldrank
pl: Napoje mleczne
pt: Bebidas lácteas
ru: молочные напитки
zh: 奶饮料, 乳饮料

en: Flavoured milks, Flavored milks, Flavoured milks with sugar partially skimmed fortified with vitamins and chemicals elements
bg: Ароматизирани млека
ca: Llet aromatitzada
de: Aromatisierte Milch
es: Leches aromatizadas
fi: maustetut maidot
fr: Laits aromatisés, lait aromatisé, Boissons lactées aromatisées sucrées au lait partiellement écrémé enrichies en vitamines et minéraux
hr: Aromatizirana mlijeka
it: Latte aromatizzato
lt: Aromatizuotas pienas, Aromatizuoti pieno gėrimai
nl: Gearomatiseerde zuiveldranken
pt: Leites aromatizados
tr: Aromalı süt

en: Chocolate milks
de: Schokoladenmilch
es: Leches de chocolate
fi: valmiit kaakaot
fr: Laits aromatisés au chocolat, laits au chocolat, laits chocolatés
hr: Čokoladna mlijeka
it: Latte al cioccolato
ja: チョコレートミルク
lt: Šokoladinis pienas
nl: Chocolademelken, Chocolademelk, Chocolade melken
pt: Leites com chocolate
sv: Chokladmjölk
tr: Çikolatalı sütler
zh: 巧克力奶

en: Partially skimmed chocolate milks
fr: Laits aromatisés au chocolat partiellement écrémés